Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 13
G

EORGIA GOLF HALL OF FAME AUTHORITY

12-3-580 through 12-3-592.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 753, § 1/SB 449, effective June 2, 2010.

Editor's notes.

- This part consisted of Code Sections 12-3-580 through 12-3-592, relating to the Georgia Golf Hall of Fame Authority, and was based on Ga. L. 1998, p. 1563,

§

1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 306,

§

16/SB 125.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 753,

§

4/SB 449, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The state, acting by and through its State Properties Commission, shall be authorized to sell by competitive bid all real property owned or controlled by the Georgia Golf Hall of Fame or its authority or board for a consideration of not less than the fair market value as determined by the State Properties Commission and not less than the amount of the outstanding bond indebtedness associated with the Georgia Golf Hall of Fame. Such sale shall be as provided in Code Section 50-16-39. Such authorization shall expire three years after the effective date of this Act." This Act became effective June 2, 2010.